Florida, session 2026, SB1074.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 16 17 Section 1.âParagraph (c) is added to subsection (10) of 18 section 212.12, Florida Statutes, to read: 19 212.12âDealerâs credit for collecting tax; penalties for 20 noncompliance; powers of Department of Revenue in dealing with 21 delinquents; rounding; records required.â 22 (10) 23 (c)1.âFor purposes of this paragraph, the term âcashâ has 24 the same meaning as defined in 12 U.S.C. s. 4001. 25 2.âIf the 1-cent piece is no longer in production, an in 26 person cash transaction may be rounded to the nearest nickel 27 using the following methodology: 28 a.âIf the final digit of a cash transaction ends in 1 or 2 29 cents, it must be rounded down to zero. 30 b.âIf the final digit of a cash transaction ends in 3 or 4 31 cents, it must be rounded up to 5 cents. 32 c.âIf the final digit of a cash transaction ends in 6 or 7 33 cents, it must be rounded down to 5 cents. 34 d.âIf the final digit of a cash transaction ends in 8 or 9 35 cents, it must be rounded up to 10 cents. 36 e.âCash transactions ending in 0 or 5 cents are not 37 rounded. 38 3.âRounding to the nickel applies only to cash 39 transactions. Rounding to the nickel does not apply to any 40 transaction for which payment is made by a noncash method, 41 including electronic funds transfer; check; gift card; money 42 order; credit card; or mixed tender, except to the extent that 43 cash is dispersed to the purchaser. 44 4.âRounding to the nickel does not alter the sales price, 45 the amount of tax collected under this chapter, or any 46 surcharges, assessments, or fees imposed on the sale. 47 5.âRounding to the nickel may apply to the amount of the 48 transaction or to the amount of change tendered to the 49 purchaser. 50 6.âRounding to the nickel does not alter or affect the 51 exact amounts authorized, cleared, or settled through any 52 noncash payment system or electronic transaction. 53 Section 2.âSubsection (8) is added to section 501.212, 54 Florida Statutes, to read: 55 501.212âApplication.âThis part does not apply to: 56 (8)âRounding a consumer sale to the nickel if the 1-cent 57 piece is no longer in production. 58 Section 3.âPresent subsections (2) and (3) of section 59 538.235, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (3) 60 and (4), respectively, and a new subsection (2) is added to that 61 section, to read: 62 538.235âMethod of payment.â 63 (2)âAny cash payment made to a seller under this section 64 shall be made in the full amount due or rounded up to the 65 nearest nickel if the 1-cent piece is no longer in production. 66 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.